District of Columbia statutes.
4-1321.07

Failure to make report.

Any person required to make a report under this subchapter who willfully fails to make such a report shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both. Violations of this subchapter shall be prosecuted by the Attorney General of the District of Columbia or his or her agent in the name of the District of Columbia.

Nov. 6, 1966, Pub. L. 89-775, § 7
Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title I, § 103(g), 24 DCR 3341
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 203(c), 53 DCR 8610
June 8, 2013, D.C. Law 19-315, § 2(b), 60 DCR 1702
This section is referenced in § 16-801.
1981 Ed., § 2-1357.
1973 Ed., § 2-167.
D.C. Law 16-306 substituted “$300” for “$100”; and substituted “90” for “30”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-315 rewrote this section, which formerly read: “Any person required to make a report under this subchapter who willfully fails to make such a report shall be fined not more than $300 or imprisoned for not more than 90 days or both. Violations of this subchapter shall be prosecuted by the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia or his or her agent in the name of the District of Columbia.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 203(c) of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 203(c) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 203(c) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 203(c) of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).